District of Columbia statutes.
4-251.06

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-69, § 106, 53 DCR 54

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-251.03 and § 4-251.04.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 106 of Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-278, February 22, 2006, 53 DCR 1459).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Act 16-278, the Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Establishment Emergency Act of 2006, and any substantially identical successor legislation, see Mayor’s Order 2006-38, March 20, 2006 ( 53 DCR 5078).

Resolutions

Resolution 16-795, the “Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Subsidy Rules Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective September 21, 2006.